inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VTI_CNJ_TI3.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwangen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwegwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaagwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijinigwen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwiingen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiweg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisigwaa
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisinig
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijising
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyaang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyang
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyeg
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: miijid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaad
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijinid
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijing
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0SgO/0PlO: adaaweyaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiwangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [miijisiwegiban,miijisiwegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisigwaaban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisinigoban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijisingiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyaambaan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyamban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyaangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiyangiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [miijiyegiban,miijiyegoban]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaapan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijinipan
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijingiban
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [miijisiiwegibanen1,miijisiiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijisiiwiingibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaambaanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwambanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwangibanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: [miijiwegibanen,miijiwegobanen]
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwaagobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: miijinigobanen
     miijin+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+0SgO/0PlO: miijiwiingibanen
